hu_HU.aff
SFX C   0    cskenél      [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX C   0    cskenek      [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX C   0    csken        [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX C   0    cskeig       [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX C   0    cskehez      [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX C   0    cskebõl      [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX C   0    cskeben      [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX C   0    cskebe       [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX C   0    cske         [iouáéíóõöúûü]
