hu_HU.dic
üvölthetõ/CDHWRMX
ütendõ/CDHWRMX
üresíttethetõ/CDHWRMX
ülepíttetõ/CDHWRMXY
ügyetlenkedtetõ/CDHWRMXY
üdvözölhetõ/CDHWRMX
újezüst/CWMmRYcD
ötletszerû/CDHWRM
összeszerelõ/CWMRymYcD
örökös/CWMmTYcDBDGVNMT
öregbültetõ/CDHWRMXY
öntözhetõ/CDHWRMX
önfejûsködendõ/CDHWRMX
öltöztethetõ/CDHWRMX
ölelgetendõ/CDHWRMX
öklendezõ/CDHWRMXY
öblíttetõ/CDHWRMXY
õrlõ/CDHWRMCDHMWXRY
ízlõ/CDHWRMXY
ítélkeztetõ/CDHWRMXY
étkeztetõ/CDHWRMXY
ésszerûsítõ/CDHWRMXY
érzékeltettethetõ/CDHWRMX
értõ/CDHWRMXY
értesültethetõ/CDHWRMX
érleltethetõ/CDHWRMX
éretlenkedhetõ/CDHWRMX
érdekeltetõ/CDHWRMXY
émelyítõ/CDHWRMXY
élvezendõ/CDHWRMX
élesztõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
élcelõdõ/CDHWRMXY
ékelhetõ/CDHWRMX
édesgethetõ/CDHWRMX
átéltetõ/CDHWRMY
átgöröghetõ/CDHWRMX
általérendõ/CDHWRM
Ösöd/CWMR
Ároktõ/CWMR
zörömböltethetõ/CDHWRMX
zöngicséltetõ/CDHWRMXY
zöcskölt/CDHRWX
zsírkõ/CWYc
zsendült/CDHRWX
zenéltethetõ/CDHWRMX
völgyelendõ/CDHWRMX
vízkõ/CWYc
vételezhetõ/CDHWRMX
vérezhetõ/CDHWRMX
véleményezhetõ/CDHWRMX
végiglesendõ/CDHWRM
védekezendõ/CDHWRMX
vizesíttethetõ/CDHWRMX
visszaéltetõ/CDHWRMY
vikszelhetõ/CDHWRMX
vezettethetõ/CDHWRMX
vetélendõ/CDHWRMX
veszítõ/CDHWRMXY
veszejtethetõ/CDHWRMX
versengendõ/CDHWRMX
verejtékeztethetõ/CDHWRMX
vegyültethetõ/CDHWRMX
vaslépcsõ/CWMRymYcD
utánaérõ/CDHWRMY
tüsszögõ/CDHWRMXY
tülkölõ/CDHWRMXY
tûzködendõ/CDHWRMX
túlértethetõ/CDHWRM
törülgettethetõ/CDHWRMX
törzskönyveltetõ/CDHWRMXY
törpítendõ/CDHWRMX
töpörtyû/CWMRmYcD
tömörültetõ/CDHWRMXY
tömködtetõ/CDHWRMXY
töltekeztetõ/CDHWRMXY
töföghetõ/CDHWRMX
tõkésíthetõ/CDHWRMX
térülõ/CDHWRMXY
térdeltethetõ/CDHWRMX
tépdelendõ/CDHWRMX
trüszkölendõ/CDHWRMX
torzsokszög/CWMmTYcD
tiszteleghetõ/CDHWRMX
tetvezendõ/CDHWRMX
tesztelendõ/CDHWRMX
terveztetõ/CDHWRMXY
terméskõ/CWYc
terjesztendõ/CDHWRMX
teremtethetõ/CDHWRMX
teperhetõ/CDHWRMX
temetõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
települtethetõ/CDHWRMX
tekintetõ/CDHWRMXY
tekeregõ/CDHWRMXY
tartalékversenyzõ/CWMRmYcD
sürögõ/CDHWRMXY
sülõ/CDHWRMXY
sûrûsödött/CDHRWX
sötétbõrû/CWMRmYcD
síneztetõ/CDHWRMXY
sávolykötésû/CWMRmYcD
szüntettetõ/CDHWRMXY
szûrhetõ/CDHWRMX
szövögetendõ/CDHWRMX
szörpölõ/CDHWRMXY
szöktettethetõ/CDHWRMX
szõrösszívû/CWMRmYcD
szívleltethetõ/CDHWRMX
színesíttetõ/CDHWRMXY
szélezõ/CDHWRMXY
székelõ/CDHWRMXY
szédeleghetõ/CDHWRMX
szállítóeszköz/CWMymTYcD
szilvesztereztetõ/CDHWRMXY
szerzõdtettetõ/CDHWRMXY
szeretõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
szerencséltetendõ/CDHWRMX
szentségtörõ/CDHWRM
szenesültetõ/CDHWRMXY
személyesíttethetõ/CDHWRMX
szemezhetõ/CDHWRMX
szembesíttethetõ/CDHWRMX
szellemültethetõ/CDHWRMX
szegültethetõ/CDHWRMX
szegezõdött/CDHRWX
szedetõ/CDHWRMXY
szabadidõ/CWMRmYcD
steppelendõ/CDHWRMX
spicliskedõ/CDHWRMXY
smaciztethetõ/CDHWRMX
siketültethetõ/CDHWRMX
serpenyõ/CWMRmYcD
seprûztethetõ/CDHWRMX
semmisültetõ/CDHWRMXY
sejthetõ/CDHWRMX
segédhajtómû/CWYc
rühesedõ/CDHWRMXY
röstellõ/CDHWRMXY
röpdöstetõ/CDHWRMXY
rögtönöztetõ/CDHWRMXY
rétegezõdõ/CDHWRMXY
részelendõ/CDHWRMX
rémítgetendõ/CDHWRMX
rálõcsölendõ/CDHWRMX
rittyentetendõ/CDHWRMX
rezezhetõ/CDHWRMX
rettentõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
reszeltetõ/CDHWRMXY
repedõ/CDHWRMXY
rendszeresíttethetõ/CDHWRMX
remetéskedõ/CDHWRMXY
rejtjelezõ/CDHWRMXY
reggeledtetõ/CDHWRMXY
rebeghetõ/CDHWRMX
púderezõ/CDHWRMXY
pörölt/CDHRWX
pördült/CDHRWX
pödörendõ/CDHWRMX
pézsmaökör/CWMymRYcD
pufferelõ/CDHWRMXY
potyalesõ/CWMRmYcD
pisszenõ/CDHWRMXY
pingelendõ/CDHWRMX
pezsgõztetõ/CDHWRMXY
pettyezhetõ/CDHWRMX
pergetendõ/CDHWRMX
pepecselõ/CDHWRMXY
penderedõ/CDHWRMXY
pederhetõ/CDHWRMX
palántakiszedõ/CWMRymYcD
okvetetlenkedõ/CDHWRMXY
növekvõ/CDHWRMXYCDHWRM
nõdögéltethetõ/CDHWRMX
népfelkelõ/CWMRmYcD
négyrétû/CDHWRM
nyûvõdött/CDHRWX
nyögdeltetõ/CDHWRMXY
nyergelõ/CDHWRMXY
nyekkenõ/CDHWRMXY
nevetõ/CWMRymYcDCDHWRMXY
neszelhetõ/CDHWRMX
nehezült/CDHRWX
nedvezendõ/CDHWRMX
nagynevû/CWMRmYcD
nadálytõ/CWMRymYcD
mûkõ/CWYc
mérséklõ/CWMRmYcDCDHMWXRY
mérgesíttetõ/CDHWRMXY
méregtelenítendõ/CDHWRMX
mélyesztendõ/CDHWRMX
mixeltetõ/CDHWRMXY
metélhetõ/CDHWRMX
merültetõ/CDHWRMXY
merevgörcs/CWMmTYcD
mentesítendõ/CDHWRMX
meneszthetõ/CDHWRMX
mellékszereplõ/CWMRmYcD
megölendõ/CDHWRM
megtörülendõ/CDHWRMX
megpecsételõdtethetõ/CDHWRMX
megkettyinttetõ/CDHWRMXY
meggyõzõ/CWMRmYcD
megbuliztethetõ/CDHWRMX
magántermészetû/CWMRmYcD
lúdbõrzendõ/CDHWRMX
löttyenõ/CDHWRMXY
lõdözhetõ/CDHWRMX
létesíttethetõ/CDHWRMX
lényegültethetõ/CDHWRMX
légmérõ/CWMRymYcD
lámpaernyõ/CWMRymYcD
likõröztethetõ/CDHWRMX
leértékelõdendõ/CDHWRMX
levehetõ/CDHWRM
lesendõ/CDHWRM
lepedõ/CWMRmYcD
lemezeltethetõ/CDHWRMX
lelhetõ/CDHWRMX
legörögött/CDHRWX
legvégsõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRM
lefetyeltetõ/CDHWRMXY
lebilincselõ/CWMRmYcD
küszöböltetõ/CDHWRMXY
különbözõ/CDHWRMXY
közösült/CDHRWX
közvetíttetõ/CDHWRMXY
kövérítõ/CDHWRMXY
követelõztetõ/CDHWRMXY
kötözködõ/CDHWRMXY
kötegelõ/CDHWRMXY
köröztettetõ/CDHWRMXY
körbeérhetõ/CDHWRM
köpetendõ/CDHWRMX
könyökcsõ/CWYc
könnyebbítendõ/CDHWRMX
kölcsönözõ/CDHWRMXY
köcsögösködött/CDHRWX
kísérletezgetõ/CDHWRMXY
kézbesítõ/CWMRymYcDCDHWRMXY
kétnyelvû/CDHWRM
készítõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
késethetõ/CDHWRMX
kérincséltetõ/CDHWRMXY
kérdezõsködõ/CDHWRMXY
képviselhetõ/CDHWRMX
képedhetõ/CDHWRMX
kényesült/CDHRWX
kékülõ/CDHWRMXY
kányafû/CWYcCWMRmYcD
kunyizhetõ/CDHWRMX
korszerûsíttethetõ/CDHWRMX
kiüregezõ/CDHWRMXY
kivésztethetõ/CDHWRMX
kisétkû/CDHWRM
kisbõgõztetõ/CDHWRMXY
kimenõ/CWMRmYcD
kijegecesedendõ/CDHWRMX
kifejtõdõ/CDHWRMXY
kicsinyelltetõ/CDHWRMXY
khakiszínû/CWMRmYcD
keveslendõ/CDHWRMX
kettõzõ/CDHWRMXY
keserülendõ/CDHWRMX
kertesíttetõ/CDHWRMXY
kergetõdztetõ/CDHWRMXY
kereshetõ/CDHWRMX
kenõdõ/CDHWRMXY
kenceficéltethetõ/CDHWRMX
keltezõdhetõ/CDHWRMX
kelesztõ/CDHWRMXY
kefélendõ/CDHWRMX
kecsegtethetõ/CDHWRMX
kalmárszellemû/CDHWRM
jövedelmeztethetõ/CDHWRMX
jégtelenítõ/CDHWRMXY
jelmezkölcsönzõ/CWMRymYcD
jelentkeztethetõ/CDHWRMX
jegyezgetõ/CDHWRMXY
isteníttetõ/CDHWRMXY
ismerendõ/CDHWRMX
intetõ/CDHWRMXY
imádságoskönyv/CWMmTYcD
illegetendõ/CDHWRMX
igényelendõ/CDHWRMX
idõköz/CWMymTYcD
idegenkedõ/CDHWRMXY
hûvösödõ/CDHWRMXY
hörpölhetõ/CDHWRMX
hömpölygettethetõ/CDHWRMX
hõkezelendõ/CDHWRMX
hímvesszõ/CWMRymYcD
házasságszerzõ/CWMRmYcD
hosszúszõrû/CWMRymYcD
hitegethetõ/CDHWRMX
hevült/CDHRWX
heteltetõ/CDHWRMXY
hentergõztethetõ/CDHWRMX
hengeredõ/CDHWRMXY
helyiérdekû/CWMRmYcD
hehezendõ/CDHWRMX
hegedült/CDHRWX
határidejû/CDHWRM
hangszerelõ/CDHWRMXY
hajókikötõ/CWMRymYcD
gümõ/CWMRmYcD
görgethetõ/CDHWRMX
görbítgethetõ/CDHWRMX
gömbölyödött/CDHRWX
gõzöltethetõ/CDHWRMX
gépiesítõ/CDHWRMXY
gyümölcsöztettethetõ/CDHWRMX
gyûrõdött/CDHRWX
gyûjtetõ/CDHWRMXY
gyöngíttethetõ/CDHWRMX
gyökeredztetõ/CDHWRMXY
gyógyfû/CWMRmYcD
gyepûztethetõ/CDHWRMX
gonosztevõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRM
gerjedezõ/CDHWRMXY
gennyesedõ/CDHWRMXY
fütty/CWMmTYcD
fürkészendõ/CDHWRMX
fülelendõ/CDHWRMX
fûzhetõ/CDHWRMX
fû/CWYcCWMRmYcD
fölélendõ/CDHWRM
földeltetõ/CDHWRMXY
fókabõr/CWMymRTYcD
fércmû/CWYc
fémtömb/CWMymRYcD
félreesõ/CWMRymYcDCDHWRM
futamidõ/CWMRmYcD
freccsentethetõ/CDHWRMX
firniszeztetõ/CDHWRMXY
figyelmeztettetõ/CDHWRMXY
feszengõ/CDHWRMXY
feslõdendõ/CDHWRMX
fenõkõ/CWYc
fenekelõ/CDHWRMXY
felsõ/CDHWRM
fellebbeztetõ/CDHWRMXY
felhergelõdendõ/CDHWRMX
feleselhetõ/CDHWRMX
felejthetõ/CDHWRMX
fektethetõ/CDHWRMX
fejtendõ/CDHWRMX
fedõkõ/CWYc
fafejû/CDHWRM
etûd/CWMmRYcD
eszközölendõ/CDHWRMX
erõsbíttethetõ/CDHWRMX
eregettetõ/CDHWRMXY
enyhítendõ/CDHWRMX
emelõs/CWMmTYcD
elõkészítõ/CWMRymYcD
elvhû/CDHWRM
elnõiesedhetõ/CDHWRMX
elkényelmesedhetõ/CDHWRMX
elevenítendõ/CDHWRMX
ejtendõ/CDHWRMX
egyezõ/CDHWRMXY
egerésztethetõ/CDHWRMX
dühösítendõ/CDHWRMX
dörgölhetõ/CDHWRMX
döglött/XCDHRWXBDGVNMR
díszleteztetõ/CDHWRMXY
dirmegõ/CDHWRMXY
delejeztethetõ/CDHWRMX
csüggesztendõ/CDHWRMX
csörgetõ/CDHWRMXY
csökönyös/CWMmTYcDBDGVNMT
csépeltetõ/CDHWRMXY
csingilingiztethetõ/CDHWRMX
cserkésztetõ/CDHWRMXY
csepegtettethetõ/CDHWRMX
cselezõ/CDHWRMXY
cihelõdõ/CDHWRMXY
bürü/CWMRmYcD
börtön/CWMmTYcD
bõszültethetõ/CDHWRMX
bélyegnedvesítõ/CWMRymYcD
bridzseltethetõ/CDHWRMX
billegethetõ/CDHWRMX
beszüremkedendõ/CDHWRMX
beleérendõ/CDHWRM
begyeskedõ/CDHWRMXY
becsméreltethetõ/CDHWRMX
arcszínû/CDHWRM
aknaelhelyezõ/CWMRmYcD
Uzonkafürdõ/CWMR
Sárköz/CWMT
Rönök/CWMR
Nyírmezõ/CWMR
Magyarfülpös/CWMT
Kohóvölgy/CWMT
Jósvafõ/CWMR
Hadikörs/CWMT
Garamfõ/CWMR
Erdõs/CWMT
Csókakõ/CWMR
Bõ/CWMR
Bakonyszûcs/CWMT
